Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-304.02
Board of Trustees; works of art; duties.

The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council, shall determine the amount of money to be made available for the purchases of art for each project under its supervision. The selection of, commissioning of artists for, reviewing of design, execution and placement of, and the acceptance of works of art for each project shall be the responsibility of the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 15.